Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
334

MENTAL
HEALTH, MENTAL ILLNESS, DRUG ADDICTION,

AND
ALCOHOLISM

Part I. General and Administrative
Provisions

Section

334-1 Definitions

334-2 Mental health system

334-2.5 Contracts for facilities and services

334-2.7 Development or expansion of a forensic
facility of

the department of health

334-3 Functions of department in mental health

334-3.5 Employment program for the chronically
mentally

ill established

334-4 Personnel for mental health program

334-5 Confidentiality of records

334-6 Fees; payment of expenses for treatment
services

334-7 Donations or grants to department

334-8 Agreements

334-9 Rules

334-10 State council on mental health

334-11 Service area boards

334-12 Bilingual mental health services

334-13 Representative payee program

334-14 Group homes for substance abusers; source
of funds;

disposition of receipts

334-15 Mental health and substance abuse special
fund;

established

334-16 Annual report; forensic patient data

Part II. Operation of Psychiatric
Facilities

334-21 Licensing of psychiatric facilities

334-22 Penalty

334-23 Money belonging to patients

334-24 Admission; discharge; civil liability

Part III. State Hospital--Repealed

334-31 to 38 Repealed

Part IV. Admission to Psychiatric Facility

334-51 to 58 Repealed

334-59 Emergency examination and hospitalization

334-60 Repealed

334-60.1 Voluntary admission for nonemergency
treatment

or supervision

334-60.2 Involuntary hospitalization criteria

334-60.3 Initiation of proceeding for involuntary

hospitalization

334-60.4 Notice; waiver of notice; hearing on
petition;

waiver of hearing on petition for
involuntary

hospitalization

334-60.5 Hearing on petition

334-60.6 Period of detention

334-60.7 Notice of intent to discharge

334-61 Presumption; civil rights

334-62 Service of process and papers upon
patients

Part V. Transfer, Leave, and Discharge

334-71 Transfer of patients between facilities

334-72 Transfer of veterans

334-73 Repealed

334-74 Transfer of residents of correctional
facilities

334-75 Authorized absence

334-76 Discharge from custody

Part VI. Appeal and Review

334-81 Request for hearing

334-82 Order to show cause; guardian ad litem

334-83 Hearing

334-84 Order

334-85 Further hearings

334-86 Status of patient pending hearing

Part VII. Community Residential Treatment
System

334-101 Establishment

334-102 Criteria

334-103 Program elements

334-104 Least restrictive level of service

334-105 Evaluation

334-106 License or accreditation required

Part VIII. Assisted Community Treatment

334-121 Criteria for assisted community treatment

334-122 Definitions

334-123 Initiation of proceeding for assisted
community

treatment

334-124 Hearing date

334-125 Notice

334-126 Hearing on petition

334-127 Disposition

334-128 Treatment costs and fees

334-129 Failure to comply with assisted community

treatment

334-130 Period of assisted community treatment

334-131 Notice of intent to discharge

334-132 Objection to discharge

334-133 Petition for additional period of treatment;
hearing

334-134 Hearing for discharge

Part IX. Civil Commitment for Substance
Abuse

Outpatient Treatment

334-141 Definitions

334-142 Petition

334-143 Notice of hearing and service of petition
on

respondent

334-144 Hearing and court order

334-145 Treatment costs, fees, and costs for
petition

process

334-146 Discharge

334-147 Failure to comply with court order

334-148 Application

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1983, c 140, §3.

Cross References

Drug dealer liability, see chapter 663E.

Drug demand reduction assessments, special fund; see
§706-650.

Inspections of state-licensed care facilities; public notice,
see §321-1.8.

Insurance benefits, see chapter 431M.

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(7).

Law Journals and Reviews

Comments and Questions About Mental Health Law in Hawaii,
David B. Wexler, 13 HBJ No. 4 Winter 1978, pg. 3.

Hawaii's Noncommitment to Civil Commitment: Out of Sight,
Out of Mind, Out of Theory, Frederick Lee Hall III, 13 HBJ No. 4 Winter 1978,
pg. 21.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next